California, session 20252026, AB729.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 748.5 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:748.5. (a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the commission shall require revenues, including any accrued interest, received by an electrical corporation as a result of the direct allocation of greenhouse gas allowances to electric utilities pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 95890 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations to be credited directly to the residential, small business, and emissions-intensive trade-exposed retail customers of the electrical corporation.(2) The credit credits provided to residential, small business, and emissions-intensive trade-exposed the residential and small business retail customers of an electrical corporation shall be provided on the bills of those customers for the months of August and September of each year, or as otherwise directed by the commission to address extreme, unforeseen, and temporary circumstances, after which the commission shall continue to provide the credits during the months of August and September.(3) The credits provided to the emissions-intensive trade-exposed retail customers of an electrical corporation shall be provided on the bills of those customers for the month of August of each year, or as otherwise directed by the commission to address extreme, unforeseen, and temporary circumstances, after which the commission shall continue to provide the credits during the month of August.(b) Not later than January 1, 2013, the commission shall require the adoption and implementation of a customer outreach plan for each electrical corporation, including, but not limited to, such measures as notices in bills and through media outlets, for purposes of obtaining the maximum feasible public awareness of the crediting of greenhouse gas allowance revenues. Costs associated with the implementation of this plan are subject to recovery in rates pursuant to Section 454.(c) The commission may allocate up to 15 percent of the revenues, including any accrued interest, received by an electrical corporation as a result of the direct allocation of greenhouse gas allowances to electrical distribution utilities pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 95890 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, for clean energy and energy efficiency projects established pursuant to statute that are administered by the electrical corporation, or a qualified third-party administrator as approved by the commission, and that are not otherwise funded by another funding source.SEC. 2. Section 748.8 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:748.8. Revenues, including any accrued interest, received by a gas corporation as a result of the direct allocation of greenhouse gas allowances to a natural gas supplier pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 95890 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations that are required by the commission to be credited directly to residential customers shall be provided on the bills of those customers for the month of February of each year, or as otherwise directed by the commission to address extreme, unforeseen, and temporary circumstances, after which the commission shall continue to provide the credits during the month of February.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.